el: Διαμόρφωση crossover: 1 δρόμου (μονό φίλτρο); 2 δρόμων; 3 δρόμων; 4 δρόμων; Άλλο
fi: Jakosuotimen konfiguraatio: 1-tie (yksi suodatin); 2-tie; 3-tie; 4-tie; Muu
sl-SI: Konfiguracija kretnice: Enosmerno (enojni filter); Dvosmerno; Trosmerno; Štirismerno; Drugo
ro-RO: Configurație crossover: 1 cale (filtru unic); 2 căi; 3 căi; 4 căi; Altele
en: Crossover configuration: 1-way (single filter); 2-way; 3-way; 4-way; Other
tr: Crossover konfigürasyonu: 1 yollu (tek filtre); 2 yollu; 3 yollu; 4 yollu; Diğer
pt-PT: Configuração do crossover: 1 via (filtro simples); 2 vias; 3 vias; 4 vias; Outro
zh-CN: 分频器配置: 单路（单滤波器）; 2 分频; 3 分频; 4 分频; 其他
ru: Конфигурация кроссовера: 1-полосный (один фильтр); 2-полосный; 3-полосный; 4-полосный; Другое
ko: 크로스오버 구성: 1-way(단일 필터); 2-way; 3-way; 4-way; 기타
nb: Overgangskonfigurasjon–: 1-veis (enkeltfilter); 2-veis; 3-veis; 4-veis; Annet
lt-LT: Krosoverio konfigūracija: 1 juostos (vienas filtras); 2 juostų; 3 juostų; 4 juostų; Kita
fr: Configuration en crossover: 1 voie (filtre unique); 2 voies; 3 voies; 4 voies; Autre
sv: Crossover-konfiguration: 1-vägs (enkelt filter); 2-vägs; 3-vägs; 4-vägs; Övrigt
de: Crossover-Konfiguration: 1-Wege (Einzelfilter); 2-Wege; 3-Wege; 4-Wege; Sonstige
sk-SK: Konfigurácia výhybky: 1-pásmový (jeden filter); 2-pásmový; 3-pásmový; 4-pásmový; Iné
ja: クロスオーバー構造: 1ウェイ (シングルフィルター); 2ウェイ; 3ウェイ; 4ウェイ; その他
es: Configuración de crossovers: 1 vía (filtro único); 2 vías; 3 vías; 4 vías; Otro
nl: Crossoverconfiguratie: 1-weg (enkel filter); 2-weg; 3-weg; 4-weg; Overig
vi: Cấu hình bộ phân tần: 1 đường tiếng (bộ lọc đơn); 2 đường tiếng; 3 đường tiếng; 4 đường tiếng; Khác
zh-TW: 交叉型配置: 1 音路 (單個濾波器); 2 音路; 3 音路; 4 音路; 其他
hu: Keresztezés konfigurációja: 1-utas (egyedi szűrő); 2-utas; 3-utas; 4-utas; Egyéb
hr-HR: Konfiguracija crossovera: 1-sistemski (jednostruki filtar); 2-sistemski; 3-sistemski; 4-sistemski; Ostalo
cs: Konfigurace typu crossover: 1pásmová (jeden filtr); 2pásmová; 3pásmová; 4pásmová; Ostatní
pt-BR: Configuração de crossover: 1 via (filtro único); 2 vias; 3 vias; 4 vias; Outra
it: Configurazione crossover: A 1 via (filtro singolo); A 2 vie; A 3 vie; A 4 vie; Altro
th: การกำหนดค่าครอสโอเวอร์: 1 ทาง (ตัวกรองเดี่ยว); 2 ทาง; 3 ทาง; 4 ทาง; อื่นๆ
pl: Konfiguracja zwrotnicy: 1-drożna (pojedynczy filtr); 2-drożna; 3-drożna; 4-drożna; Inne
da: Konfiguration af crossover: 1-vejs (enkelt filter); 2-vejs; 3-vejs; 4-vejs; Andet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на кросоувъра: Еднолентов (единичен филтър); Двулентов; Трилентов; Четирилентов; Други